California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(h) For purposes of this section, an “automated drug delivery system” means a mechanical system controlled remotely by a pharmacist that performs operations or activities, other than
 compounding or administration, relative to the storage, dispensing, or distribution of prepackaged dangerous drugs or dangerous devices. An automated drug delivery system shall collect, control, and maintain all transaction information to accurately track the movement of drugs into and out of the system for security, accuracy, and accountability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 3.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Clinics [4190. - 4195.]

4190.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “clinic” means a surgical clinic licensed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, an outpatient setting accredited by an accreditation agency, as defined in Section 1248 of the Health and Safety Code, or an ambulatory surgical center certified to participate in the Medicare Program under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.).

(b) A clinic licensed by the board may purchase drugs at wholesale for administration or dispensing, under the direction of a physician and
 surgeon, to patients registered for care at the clinic, as provided in subdivision (c). A separate license shall be required for each clinic location. A clinic licensed by the board shall notify the board of any change in the clinic’s address on a form furnished by the board. The clinic shall keep records of the kind and amounts of drugs purchased, administered, and dispensed, and the records shall be available and maintained for a minimum of three years for inspection by all properly authorized personnel.

(c) The drug distribution service of a clinic shall be limited to the use of drugs for administration to the patients of the clinic and to the dispensing of drugs for the control of pain and nausea for patients of the clinic. Drugs shall not be dispensed in an amount greater than that required to meet the patient’s needs for 72 hours. Drugs for
 administration shall be those drugs directly applied, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient for his or her immediate needs.

(d) No clinic shall be entitled to the benefits of this section until it has obtained a license from the board.

(e) If a clinic is licensed by the board, any proposed change in ownership or beneficial interest in the licensee shall be reported to the board, on a form to be furnished by the board, at least 30 days prior to the execution of any agreement to purchase, sell, exchange, gift or otherwise transfer any ownership or beneficial interest or prior to any transfer of ownership or beneficial interest, whichever occurs earlier.

(f) Nothing in this
 section shall limit the ability of a physician and surgeon to prescribe, dispense, administer, or furnish drugs at a clinic as provided in Sections 2241.5, 2242, and 4170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 454, Sec. 3.   (SB 1095)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4191.

(a) Prior to the issuance of a clinic license authorized under this article, the clinic shall comply with all applicable laws and regulations of the State Department of Public Health and the board relating to drug distribution to ensure that inventories, security procedures, training, protocol development, recordkeeping, packaging, labeling, dispensing, and patient consultation are carried out in a manner that is consistent with the promotion and protection of the health and safety of the public. The policies and procedures to implement the laws and regulations shall be developed and approved by the consulting pharmacist, the professional director, and the clinic administrator.

(b) The dispensing of drugs in a clinic that has received a license under this article shall be performed only by a physician, a pharmacist, or other person lawfully authorized to dispense drugs, and only in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 31.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4192.

(a) Each clinic that makes an application for a license under this article shall show evidence that the professional director is responsible for the safe, orderly, and lawful provision of pharmacy services. In carrying out the professional director’s responsibilities, a consulting pharmacist shall be retained to approve the policies and procedures in conjunction with the professional director and the administrator. In addition, the consulting pharmacist shall be required to visit the clinic regularly and at least quarterly. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit the consulting pharmacist from visiting more than quarterly to review the application of policies and procedures based on the agreement
 of all the parties approving the policies and procedures.

(b) The consulting pharmacist shall certify in writing quarterly that the clinic is, or is not, operating in compliance with the requirements of this article. Each completed written certification shall be kept on file in the clinic for three years and shall include recommended corrective actions, if appropriate. Before July 1 of every odd-numbered year, the consulting pharmacist shall complete a Surgical Clinic Self-Assessment Form as determined by the board as a means to promote compliance through self-examination and education. The self-assessment shall assess the clinic’s compliance with current laws and regulations and include information on compounding practices as specified on the most recent version of the Surgical Clinic Self-Assessment Form approved by the board and posted on
 its internet website. The professional director of the clinic and consulting pharmacist shall certify on the final page of the Surgical Clinic Self-Assessment Form that they have read, reviewed, and completed self-assessment to the best of their professional ability and acknowledge that failure to correct any deficiency identified could result in action by the board. The completed form shall be signed under penalty of perjury, kept on file in the clinic for three years, and made available to the board or its designee, upon request.

(c) For the purposes of this article, “professional director” means a physician and surgeon acting in their capacity as medical director or a dentist or podiatrist acting in their capacity as a director in a clinic where only dental or podiatric services are provided.

(d) Licensed clinics shall notify the board within 30 days of any change in professional director on a form furnished by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 470, Sec. 5.   (AB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4193.

No clinic holding a license pursuant to this article shall be eligible for any professional dispensing fee that may be authorized under the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). No clinic holding a license pursuant to this article shall offer drugs for sale or shall charge or bill for professional services for the dispensing or administering of drugs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4194.

No Schedule II controlled substance shall be dispensed in the clinic. This limitation does not prohibit a physician from dispensing a Schedule II drug to the extent permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 11158 of the Health and Safety Code and all other provisions of law, nor does it prevent the lawful administration of Schedule II drugs on the premises of the clinic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4195.

The board shall have the authority to inspect a clinic that is licensed pursuant to this article at any time in order to determine whether the clinic is, or is not, operating in compliance with this article and all other provisions of the law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 454, Sec. 4.   (SB 1095)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Veterinary Food-Animal Drug Retailers [4196. - 4199.]

4196.

(a) No person shall conduct a veterinary food-animal drug retailer in the State of California unless he or she has obtained a license from the board. A license shall be required for each veterinary food-animal drug retailer owned or operated by a specific person. A separate license shall be required for each of the premises of any person operating a veterinary food-animal drug retailer in more than one location. The license shall be renewed annually and shall not be transferable.

(b) The board may issue a temporary license, upon conditions and for periods of time as the board determines to be in the public interest. A temporary license fee shall be fixed by the board at an amount not to exceed the annual fee for renewal of a
 license to conduct a veterinary food-animal drug retailer.

(c) No person other than a pharmacist, an intern pharmacist, a designated representative, an authorized officer of the law, or a person authorized to prescribe, shall be permitted in that area, place, or premises described in the permit issued by the board pursuant to Section 4041, wherein veterinary food-animal drugs are stored, possessed, or repacked. A pharmacist or designated representative shall be responsible for any individual who enters the veterinary food-animal drug retailer for the purpose of performing clerical, inventory control, housekeeping, delivery, maintenance, or similar functions relating to the veterinary food-animal drug retailer.

(d) Every veterinary food-animal drug retailer shall be supervised or managed by a designated representative-in-charge. The designated representative-in-charge shall be
 responsible for the veterinary food-animal drug retailer’s compliance with state and federal laws governing veterinary food-animal drug retailers. As part of its initial application for a license, and for each renewal, each veterinary food-animal drug retailer shall, on a form designed by the board, provide identifying information and the California license number for a designated representative or pharmacist proposed to serve as the designated representative-in-charge. The proposed designated representative-in-charge shall be subject to approval by the board. The board shall not issue or renew a veterinary food-animal drug retailer license without identification of an approved designated representative-in-charge for the veterinary food-animal drug retailer.

(e) Every veterinary food-animal drug retailer shall notify the board in writing, on a form designed by the board, within 30 days of the date when a designated representative-in-charge who
 ceases to act as the designated representative-in-charge, and shall on the same form propose another designated representative or pharmacist to take over as the designated representative-in-charge. The proposed replacement designated representative-in-charge shall be subject to approval by the board. If disapproved, the veterinary food-animal drug retailer shall propose another replacement within 15 days of the date of disapproval, and shall continue to name proposed replacements until a designated representative-in-charge is approved by the board.

(f) For purposes of this section, designated representative-in-charge means a person granted a designated representative license pursuant to Section 4053, or a registered pharmacist, who is the supervisor or manager of the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 32.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4197.

(a) The following minimum standards shall apply to all veterinary food-animal drug retailers licensed by the board:

(1) Each retailer shall store veterinary food-animal drugs in a secure, lockable area.

(2) Each retailer shall maintain on the premises fixtures and equipment in a clean and orderly condition. The premises shall be dry, well-ventilated, and have adequate lighting.

(b) The board may, by regulation, impose any other minimum standards pertaining to the acquisition, storage, and maintenance of veterinary food-animal drugs, or other goods, or to the maintenance or condition of the licensed premises of any veterinary food-animal drug retailer as the board determines are reasonably necessary.

(c) When, in the opinion of the board, a high standard of patient safety consistent with good animal safety and care in the case of an animal patient can be provided by the licensure of a veterinary food-animal drug retailer that does not meet all of the requirements for licensure as a veterinary food-animal drug retailer, the board may waive any licensing requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4198.

(a) Each veterinary food-animal drug retailer shall have written policies and procedures related to the handling and dispensing of veterinary food-animal drugs by veterinary food-animal drug retailers. These written policies and procedures shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Training of staff.

(2) Cleaning, storage, and maintenance of veterinary food-animal drugs and equipment.

(3) Recordkeeping requirements.

(4) Storage and security requirements.

(5) Quality assurance.

(b) Each retailer shall prepare and maintain records of training and demonstrated competence for each individual employed or retained by the retailer. These records shall be maintained for three years from and after the last date of employment.

(c) Each retailer shall have an ongoing, documented quality assurance program which includes, but is not limited to:

(1) Monitoring personnel performance.

(2) Storage, maintenance, and dispensing of veterinary food-animal drugs.

(d) The records and documents specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be maintained for three years from the date of making. The records and documents in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall be, at all times during business hours, open to inspection by authorized officers of the law.

(e) To assure compliance with the requirements of this chapter regarding operations of the veterinary food-animal drug retailer, a consulting pharmacist shall visit the veterinary food-animal drug retailer regularly and at least quarterly. The consulting pharmacist shall be retained either on a volunteer or paid basis to review, approve, and revise the policies and procedures of the veterinary food-animal drug retailer, and assure compliance with California and federal law regarding the labeling, storage, and dispensing of veterinary food-animal drugs.

The consulting pharmacist shall certify in writing at least twice a year whether or not the veterinary food-animal drug retailer is operating in compliance with the requirements of this chapter. The most recent of the written certifications shall be submitted with the annual renewal application of a veterinary food-animal drug retailer license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4199.

(a) Any veterinary food-animal drug dispensed pursuant to a prescription from a licensed veterinarian for food producing animals from a veterinary food-animal drug retailer pursuant to this chapter is subject to the labeling requirements of Sections 4076, 4076.6, and 4077.

(b) All prescriptions filled by a veterinary food-animal drug retailer shall be kept on file and maintained for at least three years in accordance with Section 4333.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 784, Sec. 3.   (AB 1073)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Applications [4200. - 4211.]

4200.

(a) The board may license as a pharmacist an applicant who meets all the following requirements:

(1) Is at least 18 years of age.

(2) (A) Has graduated from a college of pharmacy or department of pharmacy of a university recognized by the board; or

(B) If the applicant graduated from a foreign pharmacy school, the foreign-educated applicant has been certified by the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee.

(3) Has completed at least 150 semester units of collegiate study in
 the United States, or the equivalent thereof in a foreign country. No less than 90 of those semester units shall have been completed while in resident attendance at a school or college of pharmacy.

(4) Has earned at least a baccalaureate degree in a course of study devoted to the practice of pharmacy.

(5) Has completed 1,500 hours of pharmacy practice experience or the equivalent in accordance with Section 4209.

(6) Has passed a version of the California Practice Standards and Jurisprudence Examination for Pharmacists
 that, at the time of application for licensure, was based on an occupational analysis that is either current or that was replaced by another occupational analysis no more than one year before the application for licensure and the applicant meets either of the following requirements:

(A) Has passed the North American Pharmacist Licensure Examination on or after January 1, 2004, and holds an active pharmacist license in another state or territory of the United States.

(B) Has passed the North American Pharmacist Licensure Examination that, at the time of application for licensure, was based on an occupational analysis that is either current or that was replaced by another occupational analysis no more than one year before the application for licensure.

(b) Proof of the qualifications of an applicant for licensure as a pharmacist shall be made to the satisfaction of the board and shall be substantiated by affidavits or other evidence as may be required by the board.

(c) Each person, upon application for licensure as a pharmacist under this chapter, shall pay to the executive officer of the board the fees provided by this chapter. The fees shall be compensation to the board for investigation or examination of the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 213, Sec. 3.   (SB 655)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4200.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 135, an applicant may take the North American Pharmacist Licensure Examination four times, and may take the California Practice Standards and Jurisprudence Examination for Pharmacists four times. 

(b) Notwithstanding Section 135, an applicant may take the North American Pharmacist Licensure Examination and the California Practice Standards and Jurisprudence Examination for Pharmacists four additional times each if he or she successfully completes, at a minimum, 16 additional semester units of education in pharmacy as approved by the board.(c) The applicant shall comply with the requirements of Section 4200 for each application for reexamination made
 pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) An applicant may use the same coursework to satisfy the additional educational requirement for each examination under subdivision (b), if the coursework was completed within 12 months of the date of his or her application for reexamination.

(e) For purposes of this section, the board shall treat each failing score on the pharmacist licensure examination administered by the board prior to January 1, 2004, as a failing score on both the North American Pharmacist Licensure Examination and the California Practice Standards and Jurisprudence Examination for Pharmacists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 33.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4200.2.

When developing the California Practice Standards and Jurisprudence Examination for Pharmacists, the board shall include all of the following:

(a) Examination items to demonstrate the candidate’s proficiency in patient communication skills.

(b) Aspects of contemporary standards of practice for pharmacists in California, including, but not limited to, the provision of pharmacist care and the application of clinical knowledge to typical pharmacy practice situations that are not evaluated by the North American Pharmacy Licensure Examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 588, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4200.3.

(a) The examination process shall be regularly reviewed pursuant to Section 139.

(b) The examination process shall meet the standards and guidelines set forth in the Standards for Educational and Psychological Testing and the Federal Uniform Guidelines for Employee Selection Procedures. The board shall work with the Office of Professional Examination Services of the department or with an equivalent organization who shall certify at minimum once every five years that the examination process meets these national testing standards. If the department determines that the examination process fails to meet these standards, the board shall terminate its use of the North American Pharmacy Licensure Examination and shall use only the
 written and practical examination developed by the board.

(c) The examination shall meet the mandates of subdivision (a) of Section 12944 of the Government Code.

(d) The board shall work with the Office of Professional Examination Services or with an equivalent organization to develop the state jurisprudence examination to ensure that applicants for licensure are evaluated on their knowledge of applicable state laws and regulations.

(e) The board shall annually publish the pass and fail rates for the pharmacist’s licensure examination administered pursuant to Section 4200, including a comparison of historical pass and fail rates before utilization of the North American Pharmacist Licensure Examination.

(f) The board shall report to the Joint Committee
 on Boards, Commissions, and Consumer Protection and the department as part of its next scheduled review, the pass rates of applicants who sat for the national examination compared with the pass rates of applicants who sat for the prior state examination. This report shall be a component of the evaluation of the examination process that is based on psychometrically sound principles for establishing minimum qualifications and levels of competency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 44.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4200.4.

An applicant who fails either the North American Pharmacist Licensure Examination or the California Practice Standards and Jurisprudence Examination for Pharmacists may not retake that examination for at least
 45 days. The board may, in consultation with the Office of Professional Examination Services of the department, adopt a regulation establishing a different waiting period to retake the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 598, Sec. 8.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4200.5.

(a) The board shall issue, upon application and payment of the fee established by Section 4400, a retired license to a pharmacist who has been licensed by the board. The board shall not issue a retired license to a pharmacist whose license has been revoked.

(b) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active pharmacist’s license is required. A pharmacist holding a retired license shall be permitted to use the titles “retired pharmacist” or “pharmacist, retired.”

(c) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license.

(d) (1) The holder of a retired license may request to restore their pharmacist license to active status within three years of issuance of the retired license.

(2) A request made pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be accompanied by the renewal fee established in subdivision (e) of Section 4400 and demonstration that, within the two years preceding the request for restoration, the pharmacist has successfully completed continuing education consistent with the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 4231.

(3) If more than three years have elapsed since the issuance of the retired license, in order for the holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section to restore their license to
 active status, they shall reapply for licensure as a pharmacist consistent with the provisions of Section 4200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 41.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4201.

(a) Each application to conduct a pharmacy, wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, veterinary food-animal drug retailer, or outsourcing facility shall be made on a form furnished by the board and shall state the name, address, usual occupation, and professional qualifications, if any, of the applicant. If the applicant is other than a natural person, the application shall state the information as to each person beneficially interested therein or any person with management or control over the license.

(b) As used in this section, and subject to subdivision (c), the term “person beneficially interested” means and includes:

(1) If the applicant is a
 partnership or other unincorporated association, each partner or member.

(2) If the applicant is a corporation, each of its officers, directors, and stockholders, provided that a natural person shall not be deemed to be beneficially interested in a nonprofit corporation.

(3) If the applicant is a limited liability company, each officer, manager, or member.

(c) If the applicant is a partnership or other unincorporated association, a limited liability company, or a corporation, and the number of partners, members, or stockholders, as the case may be, exceeds five, the application shall so state, and shall further state the information required by subdivision (a) as to each of the five partners, members, or stockholders who own the five largest interests in the applicant entity. Upon request by the executive officer,
 the applicant shall furnish the board with the information required by subdivision (a) as to partners, members, or stockholders not named in the application, or shall refer the board to an appropriate source of that information.

(d) The application shall contain a statement to the effect that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony and has not violated any of the provisions of this chapter. If the applicant cannot make this statement, the application shall contain a statement of the violation, if any, or reasons which will prevent the applicant from being able to comply with the requirements with respect to the statement.

(e) Upon the approval of the application by the board and payment of the fee required by this chapter for each pharmacy, wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, or veterinary food-animal drug retailer, the executive officer of the board shall issue a
 license to conduct a pharmacy, wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, veterinary food-animal drug retailer, or outsourcing facility if all of the provisions of this chapter have been complied with.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the pharmacy license shall authorize the holder to conduct a pharmacy. The license shall be renewed annually and shall not be transferable.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the wholesaler license shall authorize the holder to wholesale dangerous drugs and dangerous devices. The license shall be renewed annually and shall not be transferable.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the third-party logistics provider license shall authorize the holder to provide or coordinate warehousing, distribution, or other similar services of dangerous drugs and dangerous devices. The license shall
 be renewed annually and shall not be transferable.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, the veterinary food-animal drug retailer license shall authorize the holder to conduct a veterinary food-animal drug retailer and to sell and dispense veterinary food-animal drugs as defined in Section 4042.

(j) For licenses referred to in subdivisions (f), (g), (h), and (i), any change in the proposed beneficial ownership interest shall be reported to the board within 30 days thereafter upon a form to be furnished by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 32.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.

(a) The board may issue a pharmacy technician license to an individual if the applicant is a high school graduate or possesses a general educational development certificate equivalent, and meets any one of the following requirements:

(1) Has obtained an associate’s degree in pharmacy technology.

(2) Has completed a course of training specified by the board.

(3) Has graduated from a school of pharmacy recognized by the board.

(4) Is certified by a pharmacy technician certifying organization offering a pharmacy technician certification program accredited by the National
 Commission for Certifying Agencies that is approved by the board.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations pursuant to this section for the licensure of pharmacy technicians and for the specification of training courses as set out in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). Proof of the qualifications of any applicant for licensure as a pharmacy technician shall be made to the satisfaction of the board and shall be substantiated by any evidence required by the board.

(c) The board shall conduct a criminal background check of the applicant to determine if an applicant has committed acts that would constitute grounds for denial of licensure, pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 480) of Division 1.5.

(d) The board shall not renew a pharmacy technician license unless the applicant submits proof
 satisfactory to the board that the applicant has successfully completed at least one hour of participation in a cultural competency course, as defined in Section 4231, during the two years preceding the application for renewal.

(e) The board may suspend or revoke a license issued pursuant to this section on any ground specified in Section 4301.

(f) Once an individual is licensed as a pharmacist, the pharmacy technician registration is no longer valid and the pharmacy technician license shall be returned to the board within 15 days.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 958, Sec. 2.   (AB 2194)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.5.

(a) The board may issue a designated paramedic license to an individual if they hold a license as a paramedic in this state and meets the criteria of this section.

(b) The board shall conduct a criminal background check of the applicant to determine if the applicant has committed acts that would constitute grounds for denial of licensure, pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 480) of Division 1.5.

(c) The board may suspend or revoke a license issued pursuant to this section on any ground specified in Section 4301.

(d) A license issued under this section is dependent on the validity of the holder’s paramedic license and shall be automatically suspended if the individual’s paramedic license is expired, revoked, or otherwise invalidated by the issuing authority.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 13.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.6.

Notwithstanding Section 480, the board may deny an application for licensure under this chapter if any of the following conditions apply:

(a) The applicant has been convicted of a crime or subjected to formal discipline that would be grounds for denial of a federal registration to distribute controlled substances.

(b) The applicant has been convicted of a crime involving fraud in violation of state or federal laws related to health care.

(c) The applicant has been convicted of a crime involving financial identify theft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 42.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4203.

(a) Each application for a license under Section 4180 shall be made on a form furnished by the board. The form of application for a license under Section 4180 shall contain the name and address of the applicant, whether the applicant is licensed as a primary care clinic as defined in this code, the name of its professional director, the name of its administrator, and the name of its consulting pharmacist.

(b) Upon the filing of the application and payment of the fee prescribed in subdivision (s) of Section 4400, the board shall make a thorough investigation to determine whether the applicant and the premises for which application for a permit is made qualify for a license. The board shall also determine whether this article has been complied with, and shall investigate all matters directly related to the issuance of the license. The board shall not, however, investigate any matters connected with the operation of a premises, including operating hours, parking availability, or operating noise, except those matters relating to the furnishing, sale, or dispensing of drugs or devices. The board shall deny an application for a license if either the applicant or the premises for which application for a license is made do not qualify for a license under this article.

(c) If the board determines that the applicant and the premises for which application for a license is made qualify for a license under this article, the executive officer of the board shall issue a license authorizing the clinic to which it is issued to purchase drugs at wholesale pursuant to Section 4180. The license shall be renewed annually on or before December 31 of each year upon payment of the renewal fee prescribed in subdivision (s) of Section 4400 and shall not be transferable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4203.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, when a clinic applicant submits either type of application described in subdivision (b), the board shall issue a license or incorporate the reported changes, as appropriate, within 30 days of receipt of a completed application and payment of any prescribed fees.

(b) This section applies to the following types of applications:

(1) A new clinic license application filed under Section 4180.

(2) Applications to report changes to an existing site licensed under Section 4180, including, but not limited to, changes in professional director, clinic
 administrator, corporate officers, change of location, or change of address.

(c) This section shall not be construed to limit the board’s authority to conduct an investigation to determine whether applicants and the premises for which an application is made qualify for a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 33.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4203.6.

(a) Each application for a license as a correctional clinic under Article 13.5 (commencing with Section 4187) shall be made on a form furnished by the board. The application form shall contain the name and address of the applicant, the name of its chief executive officer, as defined in Section 4187, and the name of the pharmacist-in-charge of the correctional pharmacy that provides drugs to the clinic.

(b) Upon the filing of the application and payment of the fee prescribed in Section 4400, where applicable, the board shall make a thorough investigation to determine whether the applicant and the premises for which application for a license is made qualify for licensure. The board shall also determine whether this article has been complied
 with and shall investigate all matters directly related to the issuance of the license. The board shall not, however, investigate any matters connected with the operation of a premises, including, but not limited to, operating hours, parking availability, or operating noise, except those matters relating to the furnishing or dispensing of drugs or devices. The board shall deny an application for a license if either the applicant or the premises for which application for a license is made does not qualify for a license under this article.

(c) If the board determines that the applicant and the premises for which application for a license is made qualify for a license under this article, the executive officer of the board shall issue a license authorizing the correctional clinic to which it is issued to obtain drugs pursuant to Article 13.5 (commencing with Section 4187). The license shall be renewed annually on or before December 31 of each year
 upon payment of the renewal fee prescribed in Section 4400, if applicable. A license shall not be transferable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 7.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4204.

(a) Each application for a license under Section 4190 shall be made on a form furnished by the board. The form of application for a license under this article shall contain the name and address of the applicant, whether the applicant is licensed, the type of services the facility will offer, the name of its professional director, the name of its administrator, and the name of its consulting pharmacist.

(b) Each initial application shall contain a statement from a consulting pharmacist certifying that the policies and procedures of the clinic’s drug distribution service, relative to inventories, security procedures, training, protocol development,
 recordkeeping, packaging, labeling, dispensing, and patient consultation are
 consistent with the promotion and protection of health and safety of the public. Upon the filing of the application and the payment of a fee in subdivision (s) of Section 4400, the board shall make a thorough investigation to determine whether the applicant and the premises for which application for a license is made qualify for a license. The board shall also determine whether this article has been complied with, and shall investigate all matters directly related to the issuance of the license. The board shall not however, investigate any matters connected with the operation of a premises, including operating hours, parking availability, or operating noise, except those matters relating to the furnishing, sale, or dispensing of drugs or devices. The board shall deny an application for a license if either the applicant or the premises for which application for a license is made do not qualify
 for a license under this article.
